Utah statutes.
73-5-3.   Control by engineer of division and distribution under judgments.
The state engineer and his duly authorized assistants shall carry into effect
the judgments of the courts in relation to the division, distribution or use
of water under the provisions of this title. The state engineer shall divide,
or cause to be divided, the water within any district created under the
provisions of this title among the several appropriators entitled thereto in
accordance with the right of each respectively, and shall regulate and
control, or cause to be regulated and controlled, the use of such water by
such closing or partial closing of the head gates, caps, valves or other
controlling works of any ditch, canal, pipe, flume, well or tunnel or other
means of diversion as will prevent the waste of water or its use in excess of
the quantity to which any appropriator is lawfully entitled, and shall
regulate, or cause to be regulated, the controlling works of reservoirs in
accordance with the provisions of this title. Whenever in pursuance of his
duties the state engineer regulates or causes to be regulated any head gate,
cap, valve or other controlling works of any ditch, canal, pipe, flume, well
or tunnel or other means of diversion or the controlling works of any
reservoir, he may attach to such controlling works a written notice, properly
dated and signed, setting forth that such controlling works have been properly
regulated and are wholly under his control, and such notice shall be a legal
notice as to the facts therein contained to all parties interested in the
division and distribution of the water of such ditch, canal, pipe, flume, well
or tunnel or other means of diversion or reservoir. Whenever the state
engineer is required to enter upon private property in order to carry out the
provisions of this title and is refused by the owner or possessor of such
property such right of entry, he may petition the district court for an order
granting such right, and after notice and hearing the court may grant such
permission, on security being given to pay all damage caused thereby to the
owner of such property.
